District of Columbia statutes.
26-1321

Stock deemed personal estate; transfer; contents of certificates.

The stock of such company shall be deemed personal estate, and shall be transferable only on the books of such company in such manner as shall be prescribed by the bylaws of the company; but no shares shall be transferable until all previous calls thereon shall have been fully paid. All certificates of the stock of any company organized under this chapter shall show upon their face the par value of each share and the amount paid thereon.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1307, ch. 854, § 733
July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 619, ch. 1352, § 6(5)
1981 Ed., § 26-421.
1973 Ed., § 26-321.